District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.65

Owner of a motor vehicle may give proof for others.

The owner of a motor vehicle may give proof of financial responsibility on behalf of his employee or a member of his immediate family or household in lieu of the furnishing of proof by any said person. The furnishing of such proof shall permit such person to operate only a motor vehicle covered by such proof. The Mayor shall endorse appropriate restrictions on the face of the license held by such person, or may issue a new license containing such restrictions.

History

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 137, ch. 222, § 65

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-465.
1973 Ed., § 40-481.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.